Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Medical Assistance Act
71-5-108. Payment methodology for medicaid enrollees not enrolled in medicare.

The TennCare bureau is directed to submit a state plan amendment to the centers for medicare and medicaid services that sets out a payment methodology for medicaid enrollees who are not also enrolled in medicare, consistent with provisions in § 6085 of the federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, regarding emergency services furnished by noncontract providers for managed care enrollees. The payment amount shall be the average contract rate that would apply under the state plan for general acute care hospitals. A tiered grouping of hospitals by size or services may be utilized to administer these payments. The payment methodology developed pursuant to this section shall be budget neutral for the state fiscal year 2007-2008 when compared to the actual experience for emergency services furnished by non-contract providers for medicaid managed care enrollees prior to January 1, 2007. It is the intent that this section only applies to the emergency services furnished by noncontract providers for medicaid managed care enrollees.

Acts 2007, ch. 409, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former71-5-108 (Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 8; 1969, ch. 326, § 3; T.C.A., § 14-1908; Acts 1981, ch. 476, § 3; 1982, ch. 730, § 9; 1983, ch. 151, § 1; T.C.A., §14-23-108), concerning the notification of price changes or coverage changes for additions to or deletions from the drug formulary, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 19, effective May 17, 2004.

The federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, referred to in this section, was enacted by Public Law 109-171.

71-5-109. Expenditures not to exceed appropriation.

In no event shall the services paid for by the state including assistance from the United States government require expenditure of state funds in excess of the amount appropriated for such purpose.

The commissioner may by rule and regulation fix the maximum level of services as are deemed necessary to ensure that an expenditure of state funds shall not exceed the amount provided for those purposes, as approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 14-1909, 14-23-109.

71-5-110. Application for medical assistance — Application for TennCare enrollment — Notice of change in application information.

An applicant for medical assistance under this part, or a person acting in the applicant's behalf, shall file the application in a place and manner as may be designated by the department of health or the department of human services as may be designated by the governor.

Any application for TennCare enrollment shall include the applicant's legal place of residence in addition to the applicant's address, if the address is different from the applicant's legal place of residence or is or contains a post office box number, and a telephone number. The inability to provide a legal place of residence or telephone number due to homelessness shall not, in itself, preclude eligibility. To the extent permitted by federal law, the application of a self-employed individual for medical assistance as a part of the TennCare program shall include a copy of the individual's most recent federal income tax return or, if the individual's business is newly established, documentation deemed sufficient by the bureau of TennCare or the department of human services to project self-employment earnings pending completion of the upcoming year's income tax return.

Unless expressly exempted by rule of the department from reporting under this section, each enrollee in and applicant for TennCare uninsured or uninsurable coverage, including a person who applies on behalf of a family member, shall notify the bureau of any material change affecting any information given to the bureau or the bureau's designee on or with the person's TennCare application. The enrollee or applicant shall be responsible for mailing documentation of any such change within thirty (30) days of any change. The bureau shall update the person's file to reflect such changes. An enrollee or applicant, including a person who applies on behalf of a family member, commits the offense of theft of services under title 39, chapter 14, who intentionally fails to so notify the bureau of any material change that would, if properly reported, result in ineligibility or an increase in the amount of any premium or cost sharing.

The department shall ensure that application forms for TennCare uninsured or uninsurable coverage under this part used after July 1, 2000, apprise applicants of the requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., § 14-1910; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 10; T.C.A., §14-23-110; Acts 1999, ch. 139, § 1; 2000, ch. 853, § 3; 2002, ch. 880, §§ 6, 15; 2004, ch. 673, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 853, § 4, provided that the amendment by the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2000.

Acts 2000, ch. 853, § 5, provided:

“No later than October 1, 2000, the department shall report to the TennCare oversight committee recommendations for establishing duties of medicaid applicants and enrollees to report material changes affecting eligibility. Such recommendations shall identify any categories of persons for whom, based upon program requirements, reporting should not be required; shall specify procedures for reporting; shall identify to whom such reporting should occur; and shall recommend criminal sanctions for noncompliance that constitutes theft of services.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as emergency rules pursuant to §4-5-209(now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-111. Investigation — Determination of eligibility.

When an application for medical assistance under this part is filed with the agency designated to determine eligibility under this part, the agency shall promptly make or cause to be made such investigation as it may deem necessary. The object of such investigation shall be to ascertain the fact supporting the application and such other information as may be required.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., § 14-1911; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 11; T.C.A., §14-23-111.

71-5-112. Hearing concerning eligibility.

Whenever a hearing concerning eligibility determinations is required by state or federal law or constitutional provision, the agency designated to determine eligibility shall hear such hearings before a hearing officer or administrative judge designated by the agency. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 12; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., § 14-1912; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 12; T.C.A., §14-23-112.

71-5-113. Hearing concerning matters other than eligibility.

Except as required in § 71-5-112, whenever a hearing is required by state or federal law or constitutional provision, the department shall provide such hearings before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

Such hearing shall be held in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, except that the commissioner may adopt rules that establish procedures not necessarily in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act for the review of appeals from denials of claims for payment for medical assistance under this part where the amount of the claim is less than five hundred dollars ($500).

The procedures shall include the opportunity for an informal hearing before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, who shall not be a medicaid employee.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 13; T.C.A., § 14-1913; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 13; 1984, ch. 607, § 1; T.C.A., §14-23-113.

71-5-114. Subpoena and examination of witnesses.

The appropriate departments have the power to subpoena witnesses, to compel their attendance and the production of papers and writings.

The officers and employees designated by the appropriate department may administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath in connection with any application or proceedings under this part.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 14; T.C.A., §§ 14-1914, 14-23-114.

71-5-115. Financial responsibility of relative — When may be considered — Reimbursement from responsible parties.

To the extent permitted by federal law, the department may require or permit that responsible parties of a recipient of medical assistance supplement or reimburse for any benefit or benefits rendered to the recipient pursuant to this part.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 15; 1979, ch. 177, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-1915; Acts 1982, ch. 730, § 14; T.C.A., §14-23-115.

Cross-References. Definition of “responsible parties,” §71-5-103.

71-5-116. Lien on real estate — Claim against estate — Restrictions.

No applicant shall be required to execute an agreement for a lien on real property occupied as the applicant's residence on account of medical assistance paid or to be paid on the applicant's behalf pursuant to this part.

No lien may be imposed against the real property of any recipient prior to the individual's death, on account of medical assistance paid or to be paid on the recipient's behalf pursuant to this part, except pursuant to a court judgment for recovery of benefits incorrectly paid on behalf of the recipient.

There shall be no adjustment or recovery of any payment for medical assistance correctly paid on behalf of any recipient pursuant to this part from the recipient's estate, except in the case of a recipient who was fifty-five (55) years of age or older at the time the recipient received medical assistance or services pursuant to this part. In that case, adjustment or recovery from the recipient's estate may be pursued only after the death of the individual's surviving spouse, if any, and only at a time when the individual has no surviving child who is under eighteen (18) years of age or no surviving child, as defined in § 1614 of the Social Security Act, who is blind or permanently and totally disabled, or a child who became blind or permanently and totally disabled after reaching majority, if the TennCare bureau and the personal representative agree, or, in the event of a disagreement, the court, after de novo review, finds that repayment would constitute an undue hardship to the blind or disabled child.

Before any probate estate may be closed pursuant to title 30, with respect to a decedent who, at the time of death, was enrolled in the TennCare program, the personal representative of the estate shall file with the clerk of the court exercising probate jurisdiction a release from the bureau of TennCare evidencing either:

Payment of all medical assistance benefits, premiums, or other costs due from the estate under law;

Waiver of the bureau's claims; or

A statement from the bureau that no amount is due.

To facilitate and enhance compliance with subsection (c), the following notices shall be provided:

Within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of a person's death, the department of health shall notify the bureau of TennCare, in a format to be specified by the bureau, of the death of any individual fifty-five (55) years of age or older. Each notification shall include the decedent's name, date of birth and social security number;

Within sixty (60) days of the date of issuance of either letters of administration or letters testamentary, the personal representatives of decedents shall provide notice of the death of any individual fifty-five (55) years of age or older to the bureau of TennCare, in a format to be specified by the bureau, shall state whether the decedent was a TennCare recipient and shall request a release from the bureau of TennCare pursuant to subdivision (c)(2), and an affidavit confirming notice shall be filed pursuant to § 30-2-301(b)(3);

Personal representatives of decedents shall provide notice to the court concerning whether or not the decedent was a TennCare recipient pursuant to § 30-1-117; and

Personal representatives of decedents shall provide the notice to creditors specified in § 30-2-306 to the bureau of TennCare, if the decedent was a TennCare recipient. If a notice to creditors is provided to the bureau, the bureau shall file a claim for recovery in accordance with the requirements of title 30, chapter 2, part 3.

It is the legislative intent of subdivision (d)(1) that, after the date of death, the bureau of TennCare strive vigorously to recoup any TennCare funds expended for a decedent during the decedent's lifetime.

The bureau of TennCare shall publish a form of notice to be used pursuant to subdivisions (d)(1)(A) and (B), with instructions for use of the form written in plain language. The form and instructions shall be available at the office of any clerk of court exercising probate jurisdiction, as well as available on the bureau's website. Notice shall be provided via certified mail or in any other manner designated by the bureau.

Recoveries pursuant to this section shall be prorated among the federal government, the state, and the county involved, if any, in proportion to the amounts that each contributed to the assistance and services.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 16; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 14-1916, 14-23-116; Acts 1994, ch. 682, § 1; 2002, ch. 880, § 9; 2006, ch. 639, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1, provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Acts 2006, ch. 639, § 4 provided that the amendment to this section take effect January 1, 2007. Prior to January 1, 2007, this section reads as set out in the amendment note. On and after January 1, 2007, the section reads as set out above.

Section 1614 of the Social Security Act, referred to in this section, is codified in 42 U.S.C. § 1382c.

Law Reviews.

TennCare: Expanded Estate Recovery - Recover at ALL Cost, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 711 (2015).

What to Tell Your Clients About TennCare Medicaid Estate Recovery (Tim Takacs & David McGuffey), 43 Tenn. B.J. 16 (2007).

71-5-117. Recovery of benefits — State's right of subrogation — Assignment of insurance benefit rights — Commissioner authorized to require certain information identifying persons covered by third parties — State's right of action — Determination of subrogation interest — Attorney's fees — Remittance of net subrogation interest — Subrogation interest hearing — Legislative intent.

Medical assistance paid to, or on behalf of, any recipient cannot be recovered from a beneficiary unless such assistance has been incorrectly paid, or, unless the recipient or beneficiary recovers or is entitled to recover from a third party reimbursement for all or part of the costs of care or treatment for the injury or illness for which the medical assistance is paid. To the extent of payments of medical assistance, the state shall be subrogated to all rights of recovery, for the cost of care or treatment for the injury or illness for which medical assistance is provided, contractual or otherwise, of the recipients against any person. Medicaid payments to the provider of the medical services shall not be withdrawn or reduced to recover funds obtained by the recipient from third parties for medical services rendered by the provider if these funds were obtained without the knowledge or direct assistance of the provider of medical assistance. When the state asserts its right to subrogation, the state shall notify the recipients in language understandable to all recipients, of recipient's rights of recovery against third parties and that recipient should seek the advice of an attorney regarding those rights of recovery to which recipient may be entitled. If, while receiving assistance, the recipient becomes possessed of any resource or income in excess of the amount stated in the application provided for in this part, it shall be the duty of the recipient immediately to notify the agency designated to determine eligibility under this part of the receipt or possession of such resource or income. When it is found that any person has failed to so notify the agency that such person is or was possessed of any resource or income in excess of the amount allowed or when it is found that, within five (5) years prior to the date of recipient's application, a recipient made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering the recipient eligible for assistance under this part, any amount of assistance paid in excess of the amount to which the recipient was entitled shall constitute benefits incorrectly paid. Any benefits incorrectly paid shall be recoverable from the recipient, while living, as a debt due to the state and, upon the recipient's death, as a claim classified with taxes having preference under the laws of this state.

Upon accepting medical assistance, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the state of the right of third party insurance benefits to which the recipient may be entitled. Failure of the recipient to reimburse the state for medical assistance received from any third party insurance benefits received as a result of the illness or injury from which the medical assistance was paid may be grounds for removing the recipient from future participation in the benefits available under this part; provided, that any removal from participation shall be after appropriate advance notice to the recipient and that the provider of service shall not be prevented from receiving payment from the state for medical assistance services previously furnished the recipient, and that nothing in this subsection (b) shall require an insurer to pay benefits to the state that have already been paid to the recipient.

For purposes of this subsection (c), “third party for medical services” or “third parties” includes, but is not limited to, a health and liability insurer, an administrator of an ERISA plan, an employee welfare benefit plan, a workers' compensation plan, CHAMPUS, medicare, and other parties that are by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.

The commissioner of finance and administration, the director of the bureau of TennCare, and individual managed care organizations under contract with the state are authorized to require certain information identifying persons covered by third parties for medical services. As a condition of doing business in the state or providing coverage to residents of this state, and subject to subdivision (c)(3), a third party for medical services shall, upon request from the commissioner, the director, or a managed care organization, but no less frequently than monthly, electronically provide full eligibility files that contain information to determine the period that the recipient, the recipient's spouse, or the recipient's dependents may be or may have been covered by the third party. The eligibility files shall also include the nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the third party, the name, address, date of birth, social security number, group number, identifying number of the plan, and effective and termination dates.

No third party shall be liable to a policyholder for proper release of this information to the commissioner, the director, or managed care organization.

The information shall be provided pursuant to a written request from the commissioner, the director, or managed care organization, with each third party establishing confidentiality requirements.

Third parties shall respond to any inquiry by the state regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not later than three (3) years after the date of the provision of such health care item or service.

Third parties shall agree to respond to the request for payment, by providing payment on the claim, written request for additional information with which to process the claim, or written reason for denial of the claim, within ninety (90) working days after receipt of written proof of loss or claim for payment for health care services provided to a recipient of medical assistance who is covered by the entity. Notwithstanding title 56, a failure to pay or deny a claim within one hundred forty (140) days after receipt of the claim constitutes a waiver of any objection to the claim and an obligation to pay the claim.

A payment made by a third party to the bureau or managed care organization under contract with the state shall be considered final thirty (30) months after payment is made. After that date, the amount of the payment is not subject to adjustment.

A third party shall treat a managed care organization as the bureau, for the purposes of providing the managed care organization with access to third-party eligibility and claims data authorized under subdivision (c)(2); complying with the assignment to the managed care organization of a TennCare beneficiary's right to payment; and refraining from denying reimbursement to the managed care organization, for a claim in which both of the following apply:

The beneficiary who is the subject of the claim received a medical item or service through a managed care organization that has entered into a contract with the bureau; and

The bureau has delegated third party responsibilities to the managed care organization.

To the extent necessary to reimburse the department for expenditures for its costs for services provided for any child eligible for medical services under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, the department shall have a right of action against, and shall be permitted to garnish the wages, salary, or other employment income of, any person who:

Is required by a court or administrative order to provide coverage of the costs of health services to a child who is eligible for medical assistance under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act;

Has received payment from a third party for the costs of such services provided to such child; and

Has not used such payments from the third party to reimburse, as appropriate, either the other parent or guardian of such child or the provider of such services.

The claims by the department for the costs of such services shall be subordinate to any claims for current or past-due child support.

The state's right of action under this section shall be authorized as part of the contractual functions of the individual managed care organization or organizations that incurred the medical expenses on behalf of a TennCare recipient where the TennCare program deems appropriate. The bureau of TennCare shall maintain an easily accessible and clearly identified internet web page, updated at least bi-annually, that identifies the individual managed care organization or organizations having authorization to pursue the state's right of action under this section and such internet web page, at the minimum, shall provide the appropriate manner, method and form for contacting the managed care organization or organizations. The form made accessible through such internet web page shall be consistent with the requirements of subsection (f).

Before the entry of the judgment or settlement in a personal injury case, the plaintiff's attorney shall notify and contact in writing by facsimile or certified mail return receipt requested any entity acting pursuant to and identified in accordance with subsection (e), in order to determine if the state or managed care organization or organizations have a subrogation interest. Notice by the plaintiff's attorney, at the minimum, shall provide the following information: the full name of the plaintiff's client; the client's date of birth; the client's social security number, if known; the client's TennCare or managed care organization identification number; and the date the client's claim arose. Notice by the plaintiff's attorney shall be consistent with the foregoing in order to be considered valid. Within sixty (60) days of receipt of the above-referenced notice, the entities having a subrogation interest shall respond to the plaintiff's attorney in writing via facsimile or certified mail return receipt requested with either the amount of the subrogation interest or advise the plaintiff's attorney that additional time is necessary in order to determine the amount of the subrogation interest, but in no event shall a response containing the amount of the subrogation interest exceed one hundred twenty (120) days. The plaintiff's attorney shall then inform the court regarding the results of such attorney's notice, if any. Should no specific number be claimed within the period specified herein, the subrogation shall be extinguished and disbursements may be made without recourse upon the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney. If the plaintiff's attorney received a timely response from the entities acting pursuant to subsection (e), but the amount of the subrogation interest remains in disagreement, then the trial judge may hold a hearing in accordance with subsection (i). After trial and at the time of the entry of the judgment or settlement in a case in which the state or any entity acting pursuant to subsection (e) has a subrogation interest under this section, it is the responsibility of the trial judge to calculate the amount of the subrogation interest and incorporate the court's findings concerning the subrogation interest in the final judgment or settlement. The gross amount of the subrogation interest shall be based upon the findings of the jury concerning medical expenses and evidence introduced after the trial about the total sum of moneys paid by the state or any entity acting pursuant to subsection (e) for medical expenses for injuries arising from the incident that is the basis of the action. The gross amount of the subrogation interest shall be reduced by one (1) or more of the following factors, as applicable:

To the extent that the plaintiff is partially at fault in the incident giving rise to the litigation, the subrogation interest is reduced by the percentage of fault assessed against the plaintiff;

To the extent that the finder of fact allocated fault to a person who was immune from suit, the subrogation interest is reduced by the percentage of fault assessed against the immune person;

To the extent that the finder of fact allocates fault to a governmental entity that has its liability limited under state law and the fault of the entity, when multiplied by the total dollar value of the damages found by the finder of fact, exceeds the amount of judgment that can be awarded against the entity, the subrogation interest is reduced proportionately by a percentage derived by dividing the uncollectable portion of the judgment against the governmental entity by the total damages awarded; or

To the extent that the finder of fact allocated fault to a person that the plaintiff did not sue, the subrogation interest is reduced by the percentage of fault assessed against the nonparty.

After these calculations are performed, the judge should further reduce the subrogation interest pro rata by the amount of reasonable attorneys' fees and litigation costs incurred by the plaintiff in obtaining the recovery as required in former subsection (c) [repealed].

The amount determined after performance of the calculations in subsections (f) and (g) is the net subrogation interest. If the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney collects the judgment, each has the obligation to promptly remit the net subrogation interest, and attorneys' fees and costs to any counsel employed by the state or its assignee, as required by the final judgment. In the event that the plaintiff and such plaintiff's attorney collect only a portion of the final judgment, each has the obligation to promptly remit a pro rata share of the net subrogation interest, and attorneys' fees and costs to any counsel employed by the state or its assignee, as required by the final judgment. In the event that plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney later collect additional moneys against the judgment, there is a continuing obligation on both of them to remit a pro rata share of the moneys collected as required by the final judgment.

In the event that the case between the plaintiff and the defendant is settled before trial but after a lawsuit is filed and the parties and the state or its assignee are unable to reach an agreement on the amount of the subrogation interest, the trial judge shall hold a hearing to determine the gross and net subrogation interests, taking into account the criteria listed in subsections (f) and (g) and the likelihood of collecting any judgment against parties determined to be at fault. Any aggrieved party may appeal the court's decision.

It is the intention of the general assembly that subsections (f) through (i) be used in lieu of application of the “made whole” doctrine for any recovery authorized under this section. Subsections (f) through (i), inclusive, shall also apply to cases that have been settled when no lawsuit has been filed.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 17; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., § 14-1917; Acts 1980, ch. 535, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 730, § 15; T.C.A., §14-23-117; Acts 1992, ch. 967, § 1; 1994, ch. 987, § 17; 1997, ch. 102, § 1; 2000, ch. 807, § 1; 2003, ch. 337, §§ 1-4; 2007, ch. 233, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 776, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 26, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former subsection (c), referred to in this section, was deleted by 2010, ch. 776, effective January 1, 2011.

Provisions concerning the Civilian Health and Medical Programs of the Uniformed Service (CHAMPUS), referred to in this section, are compiled in 10 U.S.C. § 1071 et seq.

Provisions concerning the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA), referred to in this section, is compiled at 29 U.S.C. § 1001, et seq.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Tenncare subrogation changes again (John A. Day), 36 No. 10 Tenn. B.J. 16 (2000).